Washington statutes.
RCW 1.70.050

Effect of authentication.

(1) Legal material in an electronic record that is authenticated under RCW 1.70.040 is presumed to be an accurate copy of the legal material.

(2) If another state has adopted a law substantially similar to this chapter, legal material in an electronic record that is designated as official and authenticated by the official publisher in that state is presumed to be an accurate copy of the legal material.

(3) A party contesting the authentication of legal material in an electronic record authenticated under RCW 1.70.040 has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the record is not authentic.

[ 2017 c 106 s 6.]